Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-444
Ditches; outlets beyond district boundaries; acquisition; procedure.

The drainage district may go beyond the limits of its district for an outlet to its drainage system, or for the purpose of conducting its main ditch or ditches, and may purchase, acquire, or condemn any needed real estate therefor. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1909, c. 150, § 1, p. 534;

R.S.1913, § 1908;

C.S.1922, § 1856;

C.S.1929, § 31-544;

R.S.1943, § 31-444;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 75, p. 481.